src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
!! !!!Nouns and their classification
!! Noun is the part-of-speech for words which require declination in number
!! and case. Additionally nouns may have optional possessive suffixes and
!! clitics combined freely at the end. While some of the nouns may exhibit 
!! limited comparative derivations, generally words that can undergo
!! comparation must be  classified into adjectives. The proper nouns that
!! are written in initial  capital letters except when derived are handled
!! separately under proper nouns, but the classification is the same.

!! !Noun stems without stem variation
LEXICON N_TALO
!! The most basic noun stem does not have any stem internal variation and
!! uses few commonest allomorphs. The words in this class are either 
!! bisyllabic or have one of common derivational suffixes: sto, ....
!! The nouns in this class end in o, u, y or ö, which determines their 
!! illative suffix and therefore exact classification:
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1o
!!€ talo: talo+N+Sg+Nom # house
!!€ talona: talo+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ talossa: talo+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ taloina: talo+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ taloista: talo+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ taloa: talo+N+Sg+Par
!!$ talota: talo+N+Sg+Par
!!€ taloon: talo+N+Sg+Ill
!!$ taloseen: talo+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ taloja: talo+N+Pl+Par
!!$ taloita: talo+N+Pl+Par
!!€ talojen: talo+N+Pl+Gen
!!$ taloiden: talo+N+Pl+Gen
!!$ taloitten: talo+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ taloihin: talo+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ talojuttu: talo+N+Sg+Nom#juttu+N+Sg+Nom # house thing
!!€ talonjuttu: talo+N+Sg+Gen#juttu+N+Sg+Nom # house’s thing
!!€ talojenjuttu: talo+N+Pl+Gen#juttu+N+Sg+Nom # houses’ thing
0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1o non-standard
!!€ taloin: talo+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ talohon: talo+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:0  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON N_ASU
!! The stems ending in u are also without variationm and the bisyllabic ones
!! have the same simple allomorph pattern:
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1u
!!€ asu: asu+N+Sg+Nom # outfit
!!€ asua: asu+N+Sg+Par
!!€ asuun: asu+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ asuna: asu+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ asussa: asu+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ asuja: asu+N+Pl+Par
!!€ asujen: asu+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ asuihin: asu+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ asuina: asu+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ asuissa: asu+N+Pl+Ine
0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1u non-standard
!!€ asuin: asu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ asuhun: asu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:0  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN ; ! in NS's intro prose


LEXICON N_HORTA
N_TALO ;
! This is experimental, I do not know
! whether it is correct, TT.

LEXICON N_KÄRRY
!!€gt-norm: Noun 1y
!!€ kärry: kärry+N+Sg+Nom # cart
!!€ kärryä: kärry+N+Sg+Par
!!€ kärryyn: kärry+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ kärrynä: kärry+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ kärryssä: kärry+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ kärryjä: kärry+N+Pl+Par
!!€ kärryjen: kärry+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ kärryihin: kärry+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ kärryinä: kärry+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ kärryissä: kärry+N+Pl+Ine
0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1y non-standard
!!€ kärryin: kärry+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ kärryhyn: kärry+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:0  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON N_MÖMMÖ
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1ö
!!€ mömmö: mömmö+N+Sg+Nom # gunk
!!€ mömmöä: mömmö+N+Sg+Par
!!€ mömmöön: mömmö+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ mömmönä: mömmö+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ mömmössä: mömmö+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ mömmöjä: mömmö+N+Pl+Par
!!€ mömmöjen: mömmö+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ mömmöihin: mömmö+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ mömmöinä: mömmö+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ mömmöissä: mömmö+N+Pl+Ine
0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1ö non-standard
!!€ mömmöin: mömmö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ mömmöhön: mömmö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:0  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN ; ! in NS's intro prose

!! !Basic gradation cases
!! The basic stems without variations other than consonant gradation.
LEXICON N_UKKO
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1ko
!!€ ukko: ukko+N+Sg+Nom # geezer
!!€ ukossa: ukko+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ ukoista: ukko+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ ukkoihin: ukko+N+Pl+Ill
0:ko      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1ko non-standard
!!€ ukkoin: ukko+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ ukkohon: ukko+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:ko  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ko   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ; ! in NS's intro prose


LEXICON N_TIKKU
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1ku
!!€ tikku: tikku+N+Sg+Nom # stick
!!€ tikussa: tikku+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ tikuista: tikku+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ tikkuihin: tikku+N+Pl+Ill
0:ku   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1ku non-standard
!!€ tikkuin: tikku+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ tikkuhun: tikku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:ku  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN ; ! in NS's intro prose


LEXICON N_MYRKKY
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 1ky
!!€ myrkky: myrkky+N+Sg+Nom # poison
!!€ myrkyssä: myrkky+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ myrkyistä: myrkky+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ myrkkyihin: myrkky+N+Pl+Ill
0:ky   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ky   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:y       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ky      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 1ky non-standard
!!€ myrkkyin: myrkky+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ myrkkyhyn: myrkky+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:ky  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ky   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HYN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON  N
arvokasvu+N:arvo#kasvu N_ASU  ;
asiakirjalaukku+N:asiakirja#lauk N_TIKKU  ;
aukiokammo+N:aukio#kammo N_TALO  ;
baptistikirkko+N:baptisti#kirk N_UKKO  ;
biosähkö+N:bio#sähkö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
CDROMlevy+N:CD#ROM#levy N_KÄRRY  ;
emosolu+N:emo#solu N_ASU  ;
enemmistö+N:enemmistö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
enkelkuoro+N:enkelkuoro N_TALO  ;
fantomisärky+N:fantomisär N_MYRKKY  ;
farkku+N:fark N_TIKKU  ;
hajautumismyrkky+N:hajautumis#myrk N_MYRKKY  ;
halko+N:hal N_UKKO  ;
hammassärky+N:hammas#sär N_MYRKKY  ;
harju+N:harju N_ASU  ;
haudanryöstö+N:haudan#ryöstö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
henkilöhahmo+N:henkilö#hahmo N_TALO  ;
henry+N:henry N_KÄRRY  ;
hermostomyrkky+N:hermosto#myrk N_MYRKKY  ;
hintasulku+N:hinta#sul N_TIKKU  ;
huoltohenkilöstö+N:huolto#henkilöstö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
huonekalu+N:huone#kalu N_ASU  ;
hylkyaukko+N:hylky#auk N_UKKO  ;
hylky+N:hyl N_MYRKKY  ;
höyry+N:höyry N_KÄRRY  ;
intiaanipolku+N:intiaani#pol N_TIKKU  ;
intiannorsu+N:intiannorsu N_ASU  ;
irtiolo+N:irtiolo N_TALO  ;
jalkasärky+N:jalka#sär N_MYRKKY  ;
joukko+N:jouk N_UKKO  ;
junahenkilöstö+N:juna#henkilöstö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
juomasuihku+N:juoma#suihku N_ASU  ;
jäähdytyslevy+N:jäähdytys#levy N_KÄRRY  ;
kaarisulku+N:kaari#sul N_TIKKU  ;
kalajauho+N:kala#jauho N_TALO  ;
kamelirokko+N:kameli#rok N_UKKO  ;
kameravaunu+N:kamera#vaunu N_ASU  ;
karvaskurkku+N:karvas#kurk N_TIKKU  ;
kasvosärky+N:kasvo#sär N_MYRKKY  ;
kaukotaju+N:kauko#taju N_ASU  ;
kelopääsky+N:kelo#pääsky N_KÄRRY  ;
kero+N:kero N_TALO  ;
kerroskakku+N:kerros#kak N_TIKKU  ;
kidusverkko+N:kidus#verk N_UKKO  ;
kiinankeltakärhö+N:kiinankelta#kärhö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
koekakku+N:koe#kak N_TIKKU  ;
kongressitalo+N:kongressi#talo N_TALO  ;
kopsu+N:kopsu N_ASU  ;
korttilukko+N:kortti#luk N_UKKO  ;
kostusöljy+N:kostusöljy N_KÄRRY  ;
kurkunlaikku+N:kurkun#laik N_TIKKU  ;
kuvataso+N:kuva#taso N_TALO  ;
kyykky+N:kyyk N_MYRKKY  ;
käry+N:käry N_KÄRRY  ;
käsitteistö+N:käsitteistö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
lainakorko+N:laina#kor N_UKKO  ;
laivanhylky+N:laivanhyl N_MYRKKY  ;
landepaukku+N:lande#pauk N_TIKKU  ;
lapinhullu+N:lapinhullu N_ASU  ;
leveähuulisarvikuono+N:leveähuuli#sarvikuono N_TALO  ;
linjahenkilöstö+N:linja#henkilöstö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
loppusyksy+N:loppu#syksy N_KÄRRY  ;
lukinverkko+N:lukin#verk N_UKKO  ;
lykky+N:lyk N_MYRKKY  ;
lämpötasapaino+N:lämpö#tasapaino N_TALO  ;
maailmankuulu+N:maa#ilman#kuulu N_ASU  ;
maalaisserkku+N:maalais#serk N_TIKKU  ;
mahtikäsky+N:mahti#käsky N_KÄRRY  ;
makkarapötkö+N:makkara#pötkö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
metsänpeikko+N:metsän#peik N_UKKO  ;
mikro+N:mikro N_TALO  ;
mulkku+N:mulk N_TIKKU  ;
muototaju+N:muoto#taju N_ASU  ;
määkäisy+N:määkäisy N_KÄRRY  ;
möhjö+N:möhjö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
mölkky+N:mölk N_MYRKKY  ;
nivelrikko+N:nivel#rik N_UKKO  ;
nivelsärky+N:nivel#sär N_MYRKKY  ;
noitavaino+N:noita#vaino N_TALO  ;
oliiviöljy+N:oliivi#öljy N_KÄRRY  ;
orkku+N:ork N_TIKKU  ;
osmansolmu+N:osmansolmu N_ASU  ;
paikallaolo+N:paikallaolo N_TALO  ;
palko+N:pal N_UKKO  ;
pallonryöstö+N:pallon#ryöstö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
piikkikorko+N:piikki#kor N_UKKO  ;
piippuruoho+N:piippu#ruoho N_TALO  ;
piparkakku+N:piparkak N_TIKKU  ;
piraattilevy+N:piraatti#levy N_KÄRRY  ;
pirskottelu+N:pirskottelu N_ASU  ;
puliukko+N:puli#uk N_UKKO  ;
puoluelehdistö+N:puolue#lehdistö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
puolustuskeino+N:puolustus#keino N_TALO  ;
pyrky+N:pyr N_MYRKKY  ;
pyykkikärry+N:pyykki#kärry N_KÄRRY  ;
pölyhuisku+N:pöly#huisku N_ASU  ;
rahansäästö+N:rahan#säästö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
rauhanjoukko+N:rauhan#jouk N_UKKO  ;
reisisärky+N:reisi#sär N_MYRKKY  ;
reissuvihko+N:reissu#vihko N_TALO  ;
riemukulku+N:riemukul N_TIKKU  ;
rimalevy+N:rima#levy N_KÄRRY  ;
rynkky+N:rynk N_MYRKKY  ;
saagokäpypalmu+N:saago#käpypalmu N_ASU  ;
saappaankorko+N:saappaan#kor N_UKKO  ;
saksankärhö+N:saksan#kärhö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
salamalevy+N:salama#levy N_KÄRRY  ;
saostuskaivo+N:saostuskaivo N_TALO  ;
selleritikku+N:selleri#tik N_TIKKU  ;
soijaöljy+N:soija#öljy N_KÄRRY  ;
sosiaaliporno+N:sosiaali#porno N_TALO  ;
spurgu+N:spurgu N_ASU  ;
suolistomyrkky+N:suolisto#myrk N_MYRKKY  ;
syöttikoukku+N:syötti#kouk N_TIKKU  ;
säikeistö+N:säikeistö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
sävelasteikko+N:sävelasteik N_UKKO  ;
taustamelu+N:tausta#melu N_ASU  ;
teekärry+N:tee#kärry N_KÄRRY  ;
teollisuusmyrkky+N:teollisuus#myrk N_MYRKKY  ;
testistö+N:testistö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
trio+N:trio N_TALO  ;
tulitikku+N:tuli#tik N_TIKKU  ;
tyyny+N:tyyny N_KÄRRY  ;
tyypistö+N:tyypistö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
täimyrkky+N:täi#myrk N_MYRKKY  ;
uhrisavu+N:uhri#savu N_ASU  ;
uskalikko+N:uskalik N_UKKO  ;
vasemmistolehdistö+N:vasemmisto#lehdistö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
vastavärilaikku+N:vastaväri#laik N_TIKKU  ;
verovirasto+N:vero#virasto N_TALO  ;
vesakkomyrkky+N:vesakko#myrk N_MYRKKY  ;
vesihöyry+N:vesi#höyry N_KÄRRY  ;
viestinjuoksu+N:viestinjuoksu N_ASU  ;
voimansiirtoverkko+N:voiman#siirto#verk N_UKKO  ;
yleissävy+N:yleis#sävy N_KÄRRY  ;
ylimystö+N:ylimystö N_MÖMMÖ  ;
